Hawaii statutes.
§397-5 Fees. (a) The director may
prescribe reasonable fees to be charged for inspection, examination, other
services rendered and for permits, certificates, or licenses, the issuance of
which are required by this chapter or by any rules of the department adopted
pursuant to this chapter, and for:

(1) Inspections by the department of any boiler,
pressure system, amusement ride, and elevator and kindred equipment for which a
permit or certificate is required for its installation, operation, or use, and which
is required to be inspected by this chapter or by any rules of the department;
and

(2) Examination of any person applying for permits,
certificates, or licenses as required by this chapter or by any rules of the
department.

(b) All fees received by the department
pursuant to this section shall be paid into the boiler and elevator special
fund.

(c) Effective July 1, 2012, the fees for
inspections, permits, and examinations of boilers, pressure systems, elevators,
kindred equipment, and amusement rides shall be as prescribed by the schedules
in this section; provided that the director may adopt rules pursuant to chapter
91 to amend the fees specified in this section.

SCHEDULE A:
Boiler and Pressure System Fees

Installation, Repair, and Alteration Permit
Fees:

(1) Power Boilers (shall pass a hydrostatic test
unless indicated otherwise):

Miniature electric (no
hydrostatic test required) $190

Less than 500 square
feet of heating surface $250

Greater
than or equal to 500 and less than or equal to 3,000 square feet of heating
surface $400

Greater than 3,000
square feet of heating surface $750

(2) Heating boiler $190

Retrofit $160

(3) Pressure vessel $175

Retrofit $130

(4) Sterilizers and steam
kettles $150

Retrofit $110

(5) Repair application fee $200

(6) Alteration application
fee $500

Examination and License Fees:

(1) Boiler inspectors
certificate of competency examination fee $300

(2) Review of shops and
facilities for the issuance of National Board or American Society of Mechanical
Engineers certificate of authorization $1,500

(3) Review of shops and
facilities for the issuance of Non-Boiler External Piping certificate of
authorization $750

(4) Boiler inspector's
Hawaii commission, initial and renewal $75

Internal and External Inspection Fees:

(1) Power boilers:

Without manholes $150

With
manholes but less than or equal to 3,000 square feet of heating surface $180

With
manholes greater than 3,000 and less than or equal to 10,000 square feet of
heating surface $260

With
manholes and over 10,000 square feet of heating surface $450

(2) Heating boilers:

Hot water supply $130

Steam and water
heating without manholes $110

Steam,
over 100 square feet but not over 500 square feet of heating surface $140

All
with manholes and steam over 500 square feet of heating surface $170

(3) Pressure vessels:

Routine inspections $65

Internal for air or
water service $130

Ultrasonic testing $130

(4) For all other types of
inspections an hourly fee is assessed $100

(5) Hydrostatic test $300

(6) School
"specials" (non-code objects) $10

Reports and Permit Processing Fees:

(1) Report and permit $25

(2) Permit reprint $20

(3) Signed permit card
(old issue) $10

(4) Owner portal $5

SCHEDULE B:
Elevator and Kindred Equipment Fees

Installation and Alteration Permits:

(1) Alteration involving
only the replacement of up to two parts (such as a valve, a jack, or a
cylinder) $150

(2) Alteration involving
only cosmetic changes (such as car interior modernizations) $300

(3) Alterations of more
than two parts, or components, and/or subsystems:

1 - 3 floors $600

4 - 9 floors $650

10 - 19 floors $700

20 - 29 floors $750

30 - 39 floors $800

40 or more floors $900

(4) Where alterations to four or more units at the
same location are identical, the fee for each additional alteration permit
shall be reduced by fifty per cent. The applications shall be submitted at the
same time to qualify for the fee reduction.

(5) Installation of new
elevators (including material lifts) and kindred equipment:

Dumbwaiter $500

Escalator, moving
walk, or moving ramp $500

Hand elevator,
manlift, or stage lift $500

Wheelchair or stairway
lifts $500

Elevator, 1 - 3 floors
$600

Elevator, 4 - 9 floors $650

Elevator, 10 - 19
floors $700

Elevator, 20 - 29
floors $750

Elevator, 30 - 39
floors $800

Elevator, 40 or more
floors $900

Aerial tramways $900

Personnel hoists $250

Inclined tunnel lifts $500

(For elevators, such as observation or deep well
elevators, which have considerable rise but few openings, each ten feet of
vertical rise shall be considered one floor for the purpose of determining
installation or alteration permit fees.)

(6) Temporary use permits (construction car) $450

(7) For each valid alteration or installation permit,
the department shall provide one inspection per unit.

(8) The fee for each additional inspection or
witnessing of tests, or both, shall be $300 per day for up to two hours and
$600 per day for more than two hours if during the normal workday. Fees for
overtime hours shall be $600 per day for up to two hours and $1,200 per day for
more than two hours.

(9) Each installation or alteration permit shall be
valid for up to one year from the date of issuance.

Inspection Fees:

(1) Permit renewal inspection
fees:

Dumbwaiter $140

Escalator, moving
walk, or moving ramp $150

Hand elevator,
manlift, or stage lift $150

Wheelchair or stairway
lifts $150

Hydraulic elevator -
holed $150

Hydraulic elevator -
holeless $200

Traction elevator:

1 - 3 floor rise $225

4 - 9 floor rise $250

10 - 19 floor rise $275

20 - 29 floor rise $325

30 - 39 floor rise $400

40 or more floor
rise $475

Aerial tramways $400

Personnel hoists $175

Inclined tunnel lifts $220

(2) Safety, load or internal test (witness
fees):

3-year safety test $200

5-year safety test $300

Escalator internal $100

(3) Permit renewal and witness fees are per
inspection, which may constitute one day or part of the day. If the inspector
is required to return on another day or at another time on the same day,
additional fees shall be assessed at the rate of $300 per day for up to two
hours and $600 per day for more than two hours. Fees for overtime hours shall
be $600 per day for up to two hours and $1,200 per day for more than two hours.

SCHEDULE C:
Amusement Ride Fees

Inspection Fees:

(1) Permit renewal inspection fees:

Amusement ride $100

(2) Permit renewal fees are per inspection, which may
constitute one day or part of the day. If the inspector has to return on
another day or at another time within the same day, additional fees shall be
assessed at the rate of $300 per day for up to two hours and $600 per day for
more than two hours. Fees for overtime hours shall be $600 per day for up to
two hours and $1,200 per day for more than two hours. [L 1980, c 19, pt of §1;
am L 1998, c 142, §§4, 9; am L 1999, c 163, §18; am L 2002, c 39, §19; am L
2003, c 178, §10; am L 2012, c 103, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next